Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LICENSES AND PERMITS, GENERAL PROVISIONS

§281-31 Licenses, classes. (a)
Licenses may be granted by the liquor commission as provided in this section.

(b) Class 1. Manufacturer license. A license
for the manufacture of liquor shall authorize the licensee to:

(1) Manufacture the liquor therein specified;

(2) Sell it in original packages to any wholesaler
who holds a license to resell it; and

(3) Sell beer, wine, or other specified liquor
manufactured or distilled on the licensee's premises from fruits or other
products grown in the State, in any quantity:

(A) At wholesale in original packages to any
person who holds a license to resell it; and

(B) To any person for private use and
consumption.

Under this license, no liquor shall be consumed
on the premises, except as authorized by the commission. Of this class, there
shall be the following kinds:

(1) Beer;

(2) Wine;

(3) Alcohol; and

(4) Other specified liquor.

It shall be unlawful for any holder of a
manufacturer license to have any interest whatsoever in the license or licensed
premises of any other licensee. This subsection shall not prevent the holder
of a manufacturer license under this chapter or under the law of another
jurisdiction from maintaining any interest in the license or licensed premises
of a wholesale dealer licensee under this chapter.

(c) Class 2. Restaurant license.

(1) A license under this class shall authorize the
licensee to sell liquor specified in this subsection for consumption on the
premises; provided that a restaurant licensee, with commission approval, may
provide off-premises catering of food and liquor; provided further that the
catering activity shall be directly related to the licensee's operation as a
restaurant. A license under this class shall also authorize the licensee to
sell beer, malt beverages, or cider for off-premises consumption; provided that
the licensee has the appropriate kind of license pursuant to paragraph (3); and
provided further that the beer, malt beverage, or cider is sold in a securely
sealed or covered glass, ceramic, or metal container that is sold to or
provided by the patron, and each sealed or covered glass, ceramic, or metal
container does not exceed a maximum capacity of one-half gallon. A licensee
under this class shall be issued a license according to the category of
establishment the licensee owns or operates. The categories of establishment
shall be as follows:

(A) A standard bar; or

(B) Premises in which live entertainment or
recorded music is provided. Facilities for dancing by the patrons may be
permitted as provided by commission rules.

(2) If a licensee under class 2 desires to change the
category of establishment the licensee owns or operates, the licensee shall
apply for a new license applicable to the category of the licensee's
establishment.

(3) Of this class, there shall be the following
kinds:

(A) General (includes all liquor except
alcohol);

(B) Beer and wine; and

(C) Beer.

Notwithstanding section 281-57, the commission may
approve at one public hearing and without notice the change to a class 2
restaurant license of a licensee holding a class 5 dispenser license who meets
the requirements of a class 2 license.

(d) Class 3. Wholesale dealer license. A
license for the sale of liquor at wholesale shall authorize the licensee to
import and sell only to licensees or to others who are by law authorized to
resell the liquor specified by the license but are not by law required to hold
a license; provided that a class 3 licensee may sell samples of liquor back to
the manufacturer. Under a class 3 license, no liquor shall be consumed on the
premises except as authorized by the commission. Of this class, there shall be
the following kinds:

(1) General (includes all liquor except alcohol);

(2) Beer and wine; and

(3) Alcohol.

If any wholesale dealer solicits or takes any orders
in any county other than that where the dealer's place of business is located,
the orders may be filled only by shipment direct from the county in which the
wholesale dealer holds the dealer license. Nothing in this subsection shall
prevent a wholesaler from selling liquor to post exchanges, ships' service
stores, army or navy officers' clubs, or similar organizations located on army
or navy reservations, or to any vessel other than vessels performing a regular
water transportation service between any two or more ports in the State, or to
aviation companies who operate an aerial transportation enterprise subject to
chapter 269 and engaged in regular flight passenger services between any two or
more airports in the State for use on aircraft, or aviation companies engaged
in transpacific flight operations for use on aircraft outside the jurisdiction
of the State.

(e) Class 4. Retail dealer license. A
license to sell liquor at retail or to class 10 licensees shall authorize the
licensee to sell the liquor therein specified in their original packages. A
license under this class shall also authorize the licensee to sell beer, malt
beverages, or cider in non-original packages; provided that the beer, malt
beverage, or cider is sold in a securely sealed or covered glass, ceramic, or
metal container that is sold to or provided by the patron, and each sealed or
covered glass, ceramic, or metal container does not exceed a maximum capacity
of one half-gallon. Under a class 4 license, no liquor shall be consumed on
the premises except as authorized by the commission. Of this class, there
shall be the following kinds:

(1) General (includes all liquor except alcohol);

(2) Beer and wine; and

(3) Alcohol.

(f) Class 5. Dispenser license.

(1) A license under this class shall authorize the
licensee to sell liquor specified in this subsection for consumption on the
premises. A licensee under this class shall be issued a license according to
the category of establishment the licensee owns or operates. The categories of
establishments shall be as follows:

(A) A standard bar;

(B) Premises in which a person performs or
entertains unclothed or in attire restricted to use by entertainers pursuant to
commission rules;

(C) Premises in which live entertainment or
recorded music is provided; provided that facilities for dancing by the patrons
may be permitted as provided by commission rules; or

(D) Premises in which employees or entertainers
are compensated to sit with patrons, regardless of whether the employees or
entertainers are consuming nonalcoholic beverages while in the company of the
patrons pursuant to commission rules.

(2) If a licensee under class 5 desires to change the
category of establishment the licensee owns or operates, the licensee shall
apply for a new license applicable to the category of the licensee's
establishment.

(3) Of this class, there shall be the following
kinds:

(A) General (includes all liquor except
alcohol);

(B) Beer and wine; and

(C) Beer.

(g) Class 6. Club license. A club license
shall be general only but shall exclude alcohol and shall authorize the
licensee to sell liquor to members of the club and to guests of the club
enjoying the privileges of membership for consumption only on the premises kept
and operated by the club; provided that the license shall also authorize any
club member to keep in the member's private locker on the premises a reasonable
quantity of liquor owned by the member for the member's own personal use and
not to be sold that may be consumed only on the premises. A club licensee
shall be authorized to host charitable functions that are open to the general
public only pursuant to commission rules.

The categories of establishment shall be as
follows:

(1) A standard bar; or

(2) Premises in which live entertainment or recorded
music is provided. Facilities for dancing by the patrons may be permitted as
provided by commission rules.

(h) Class 8. Transient vessel license. A
general license may be granted to the owner of any vessel for the sale of
liquor other than alcohol on board the vessel while en route within the
jurisdictional limits of the State and within any port of the State. Sales
shall be made only for consumption by passengers and their guests on board the
vessel. The license shall be issuable in each county where the sales are to be
made; provided that the application for the license may be made by any agent
representing the owner.

(i) Class 9. Tour or cruise vessel license.
A general license may be granted to the owner of any tour or cruise vessel for
the sale of liquor other than alcohol on board the vessel while in the waters
of the State; provided that sales be made only for consumption by passengers on
board while the vessel is in operation outside the port or dock of any island
of the State, unless otherwise approved by the county where the license has
been issued. The license shall be issuable in the county where the home port
of the vessel is situated. If, on any vessel for which no license has been
obtained under this chapter, any liquor is sold or served within three miles of
the shore of any island of the State, it shall constitute a violation of this
chapter.

The categories of establishment shall be as
follows:

(1) A standard bar; or

(2) Premises in which live entertainment or recorded
music is provided. Facilities for dancing by the patrons may be permitted as
provided by commission rules.

(j) Class 10. Special license. A special
license may be granted for the sale of liquor for a period not to exceed three
days and pursuant to commission rule may be approved by the administrator for
fundraising events by nonprofit organizations, political candidates, and
political parties; provided that any registered educational or charitable
nonprofit organization may sell liquors in their original packages for
off-premises consumption. Of this class, there shall be the following kinds:

(1) General (includes all liquor except alcohol);

(2) Beer and wine; and

(3) Beer.

Liquor sold under a class 10 license shall be
consumed on the premises.

(k) Class 11. Cabaret license. A cabaret
license shall be general only but shall exclude alcohol and shall authorize the
sale of liquor for consumption on the premises. This license shall be issued
only for premises where food is served, facilities for dancing by the patrons
including a dance floor are provided, and live or amplified recorded music or
professional entertainment except professional entertainment by a person who
performs or entertains unclothed is provided for the patrons; provided that
professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed shall
be authorized by:

(1) A cabaret license for premises where professional
entertainment by persons who perform or entertain unclothed was presented on a
regular and consistent basis immediately prior to June 15, 1990; or

(2) A cabaret license that, pursuant to rules adopted
by the liquor commission, permits professional entertainment by persons who
perform or entertain unclothed.

A cabaret license under paragraph (1) or (2)
authorizing professional entertainment by persons who perform or entertain
unclothed shall be transferable through June 30, 2000. A cabaret license under
paragraph (1) or (2) authorizing professional entertainment by persons who
perform or entertain unclothed shall not be transferable after June 30, 2000,
except upon approval by the liquor commission and pursuant to rules adopted by
the commission. Notwithstanding any rule of the liquor commission to the
contrary, cabarets in resort areas may be opened for the transaction of
business until 4 a.m. throughout the entire week.

(l) Class 12. Hotel license. A license to
sell liquor in a hotel shall authorize the licensee to provide entertainment
and dancing on the hotel premises and to sell all liquor except alcohol for
consumption on the premises; provided that a hotel licensee, with commission
approval, may provide off-premises catering of food and liquor if the catering
activity is directly related to the licensee's food service.

Procedures such as room service, self-service
no-host minibars or similar service in guest rooms, and service at parties in
areas that are the property of and contiguous to the hotel are permitted with
commission approval.

Any licensee who would otherwise fall within
the hotel license class but holds a different class of license may be required
to apply for a hotel license.

If the licensee applies for a change of
classification prior to July 30, 1992, the licensee shall not be subject to the
requirements of sections 281-52, 281-54, and 281-57 through 281‑59.

Any licensee holding a class 12 license on May
1, 2007 who would otherwise qualify for a class 15 license may apply to the liquor
commission of the county in which the licensee is seeking a change in liquor
license for a change to a class 15 license; provided that the licensee shall
not be subject to the requirements of section 281-54 and sections 281-57 to
281-60.

If a licensee holding a class 12 license on May
1, 2007 applies for a change to a class 15 license, the respective liquor
commission shall hold a public hearing upon notice. On the day of hearing or
any adjournment thereof, the liquor commission shall consider the application,
accept all written or oral testimony for or against the application, and render
its decision granting or refusing the application. If the application is
denied, the class 12 license shall continue in effect in accordance with law.

(m) Class 13. Caterer license. A general
license may be granted to any applicant who serves food as part of their
operation for the sale of liquor other than alcohol while performing food
catering functions off the premises.

No catering service for the sale of liquor
shall be performed off the licensee's premises unless prior written notice of
the service has been delivered to the office of the liquor commission of the
county concerned. The notice shall state the date, time, and location of the
proposed event and shall include a written statement signed by the owner or
representative of the property that the function will be subject to the liquor
laws and to inspection by investigators.

(n) Class 14. Brewpub license. A brewpub
licensee:

(1) May sell malt beverages manufactured on the
licensee's premises for consumption on the premises;

(2) May sell malt beverages manufactured by the
licensee in brewery-sealed packages to class 3 wholesale dealer licensees
pursuant to conditions imposed by the county by ordinance or rule;

(3) May sell intoxicating liquor purchased from a
class 3 wholesale dealer licensee to consumers for consumption on the
licensee's premises. The categories of establishments shall be as follows:

(A) A standard bar; or

(B) Premises in which live entertainment or
recorded music is provided. Facilities for dancing by the patrons may be
permitted as provided by commission rules;

(4) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages manufactured on the licensee's premises to
consumers in brewery-sealed kegs and sell malt beverages manufactured on the
licensee's premises or purchased from a class 1 manufacturer licensee, a class
3 wholesale dealer licensee, a class 14 brewpub licensee, or a class 18 small
craft producer pub licensee to consumers in growlers for off-premises
consumption; provided that for purposes of this paragraph, "growler"
means a glass, ceramic, or metal container, not to exceed one half-gallon,
which shall be securely sealed;

(5) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages manufactured on the licensee's premises in
recyclable containers provided by the licensee or by the consumer which do not
exceed one gallon per container and are securely sealed on the licensee's
premises to consumers for off-premises consumption;

(6) Shall comply with all regulations pertaining to
class 4 retail dealer licensees when engaging in the retail sale of malt
beverages;

(7) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages manufactured on the licensee's premises in
brewery-sealed containers directly to class 2 restaurant licensees, class 3
wholesale dealer licensees, class 4 retail dealer licensees, class 5 dispenser
licensees, class 6 club licensees, class 8 transient vessel licensees, class 9
tour or cruise vessel licensees, class 10 special licensees, class 11 cabaret
licensees, class 12 hotel licensees, class 13 caterer licensees, class 14
brewpub licensees, class 15 condominium hotel licensees, class 18 small craft
producer pub licensees, and consumers pursuant to conditions imposed by county
regulations governing class 1 manufacturer licensees and class 3 wholesale
dealer licensees; and

(8) May conduct the activities under paragraphs (1)
to (7) at one location other than the licensee's premises; provided that:

(A) The manufacturing takes place in Hawaii;
and

(B) The other location is properly licensed
under the same ownership.

(o) Class 15. Condominium hotel license. A
license to sell liquor in a condominium hotel shall authorize the licensee to
provide entertainment and dancing on the condominium hotel premises and to sell
all liquor except alcohol for consumption on the premises; provided that a
condominium hotel licensee, with commission approval, may provide off-premises
catering; provided further that the catering activity is directly related to
the licensee's operation as a condominium hotel.

Procedures such as room service, self-service
no-host minibars or similar service in apartments, and service at private
parties in areas that are the property of and contiguous to the condominium
hotel are permitted with commission approval.

A condominium hotel licensee shall not sell
liquor in the manner authorized by a class 4 retail dealer license.

Any licensee who would otherwise meet the
criteria for the condominium hotel license class but holds a different class of
license may be required to apply for a condominium hotel license.

(p) Class 16. Winery license. A winery
licensee:

(1) Shall manufacture not more than twenty thousand
barrels of wine on the licensee's premises during the license year;

(2) May sell wine manufactured on the licensee's
premises for consumption on the premises;

(3) May sell wine manufactured by the licensee in winery-sealed
packages to class 3 wholesale dealer licensees pursuant to conditions imposed
by the county by ordinance or rule;

(4) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell wine manufactured on the licensee's premises in winery-sealed
kegs and magnums to consumers for off-premises consumption; provided that for
purposes of this paragraph, "magnum" means a glass container not to
exceed one half-gallon, which may be securely sealed;

(5) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling requirements,
sell wine manufactured on the licensee's premises in recyclable containers
provided by the licensee or by the consumer which do not exceed one gallon per
container and are securely sealed on the licensee's premises to consumers for
off-premises consumption;

(6) Shall comply with all rules pertaining to class 4
retail dealer licensees when engaging in the retail sale of wine; and

(7) May sell wine manufactured on the licensee's
premises in winery-sealed containers directly to class 2 restaurant licensees,
class 3 wholesale dealer licensees, class 4 retail dealer licensees, class 5
dispenser licensees, class 6 club licensees, class 8 transient vessel
licensees, class 9 tour or cruise vessel licensees, class 10 special licensees,
class 11 cabaret licensees, class 12 hotel licensees, class 13 caterer
licensees, class 14 brewpub licensees, class 15 condominium hotel licensees,
and class 18 small craft producer pub licensees pursuant to conditions imposed
by county planning and public works departments and rules governing class 3
wholesale dealer licensees.

(q) Class 17. Bring-your-own-beverage
license. In counties having a population in excess of 500,000, there is
established a class 17 license; provided that in a county having a population
of 500,000 or less, the respective commission may establish a class 17 license
to which this subsection shall apply.

(1) A general license of this class shall authorize
the licensee to permit patrons to bring their own liquors for consumption on
the premises between the hours of 6:00 a.m. to 2:00 a.m. the following day. A
licensee under this class shall be issued a license according to the category
of establishment the licensee owns or operates. The categories of
establishments shall be as follows:

(A) Premises in which recorded music and live
entertainment, including karaoke, are provided; or

(B) Premises in which recorded music and live
entertainment, including karaoke and dancing, are provided.

(2) If a licensee under this class desires to change
the category of establishment the licensee owns or operates, the licensee shall
apply for a new license applicable to the category of the licensee's
establishment.

(3) A licensee under this class shall not be subject
to liquor commission rules relating to percentage fees.

(r) Class 18. Small craft producer pub
license. A small craft producer pub licensee:

(1) Shall manufacture not more than:

(A) Sixty thousand barrels of malt beverages;

(B) Twenty thousand barrels of wine; or

(C) Seven thousand five hundred barrels of
alcohol on the licensee's premises during the license year;

provided that for purposes of this paragraph,
"barrel" means a container not exceeding thirty-one gallons or wine
gallons of liquor;

(2) May sell malt beverages, wine, or alcohol
manufactured on the licensee's premises for consumption on the premises;

(3) May sell malt beverages, wine, or alcohol
manufactured by the licensee in producer-sealed packages to class 3 wholesale
dealer licensees pursuant to conditions imposed by the county by ordinance or
rule;

(4) May sell intoxicating liquor purchased from a
class 3 wholesale dealer licensee to consumers for consumption on the
licensee's premises. The categories of establishments shall be as follows:

(A) A standard bar; or

(B) Premises in which live entertainment or
recorded music is provided. Facilities for dancing by the patrons may be
permitted as provided by commission rules;

(5) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages manufactured on the licensee's premises to
consumers in producer-sealed kegs and sell malt beverages manufactured on the
licensee's premises or purchased from a class 1 manufacturer licensee, a class
3 wholesale dealer licensee, a class 14 brewpub licensee, or a class 18 small
craft producer pub licensee to consumers in growlers for off-premises
consumption; provided that for purposes of this paragraph, "growler"
means a glass, ceramic, or metal container, not to exceed one half-gallon,
which shall be securely sealed;

(6) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages, wine, or alcohol manufactured on the
licensee's premises in recyclable containers provided by the licensee or by the
consumer which do not exceed:

(A) One gallon per container for malt
beverages and wine; and

(B) One liter for alcohol; and

are securely sealed on the licensee's premises to
consumers for off-premises consumption;

(7) Shall comply with all regulations pertaining to
class 4 retail dealer licensees when engaging in the retail sale of malt
beverages, wine, and alcohol;

(8) May, subject to federal labeling and bottling
requirements, sell malt beverages, wine, and alcohol manufactured on the
licensee's premises in producer-sealed containers directly to class 2
restaurant licensees, class 3 wholesale dealer licensees, class 4 retail dealer
licensees, class 5 dispenser licensees, class 6 club licensees, class 8
transient vessel licensees, class 9 tour or cruise vessel licensees, class 10
special licensees, class 11 cabaret licensees, class 12 hotel licensees, class
13 caterer licensees, class 14 brewpub licensees, class 15 condominium hotel
licensees, class 18 small craft producer pub licensees, and consumers pursuant
to conditions imposed by county regulations governing class 1 manufacturer
licensees and class 3 wholesale dealer licensees; and

(9) May conduct the activities under paragraphs (1)
to (8) at one location other than the licensee's premises; provided that:

(A) The manufacturing takes place in Hawaii;
and

(B) The other location is properly licensed
under the same ownership.

(s) Restaurants, retail dealers, dispensers,
clubs, cabarets, hotels, caterers, brewpubs, condominium hotels,
bring-your-own-beverage establishments, and small craft producer pubs licensed
under class 2, class 4, class 5, class 6, class 11, class 12, class 13, class
14, class 15, class 17, and class 18 shall maintain at all times liquor
liability insurance coverage in an amount not less than $1,000,000; provided
that convenience minimarts holding a class 4 license shall not be required to
maintain liquor liability insurance coverage in that amount. Proof of coverage
shall be kept on the premises and shall be made available for inspection by the
commission at any time during the licensee's regular business hours. In the
event of a licensee's failure to obtain or maintain the required coverage, the
commission shall refuse to issue or renew a license or shall suspend or
terminate the license as appropriate. No license shall be granted, reinstated,
or renewed until after the required insurance coverage is obtained.

(t) It shall be unlawful for any retail
licensee except a class 10 licensee to purchase or acquire liquor from any
person other than a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this chapter, except as
otherwise provided in this section.

(u) Any provision to the contrary
notwithstanding, a patron may remove from any class of licensed premises any
portion of wine, liquor, or beer that was purchased on or brought onto the
premises of the licensee engaged in meal service for consumption with a meal;
provided that it is recorked or resealed in its original container.

(v) Sections 281-57 to 281-60 shall not apply
to classes 8, 9, 10, and 13. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §11; RL 1935, §2580; am L 1935,
c 105, §§6 to 8; am L 1937, c 211, §6; am L 1939, c 71, §§1, 2 and c 205, pt of
§1; RL 1945, §7232; am L 1947, c 148, §1; am L 1955, c 263, §2; RL 1955,
§159-30; am L 1961, c 89, §1 and c 90, §1; am L 1965, c 181, §1; am L 1967, c
172, §1; HRS §281-31; am L 1969, c 133, §1 and c 198, §1; am L 1970, c 5, §2;
am L 1976, c 87, §2; am L 1978, c 25, §1; am L 1980, c 199, §2; am L 1981, c
60, §1; am L 1982, c 183, §1; am L 1983, c 292, §1; am L 1984, c 269, §1; gen
ch 1985; am L 1988, c 383, §3; am L 1990, c 171, §9; am L 1991, c 196, §1; am L
1994, c 174, §2; am L 1995, c 38, §2; am L 1996, c 55, §1; am L 1997, c 57, §2;
am L 1998, c 75, §2; am L 1999, c 69, §1; am L 2001, c 55, §11; am L 2002, c
16, §12 and c 49, §2; am L 2004, c 200, §1; am L 2005, c 145, §1; am L 2007, c
53, §§3, 7; am L 2008, c 163, §1 and c 168, §5; am L 2009, c 177, §1 and c 184,
§6; am L 2010, c 198, §2; am L 2011, c 138, §1; am L 2012, c 302, §1; am L
2014, c 211, §3; am L 2015, c 227, §1]

Revision Note

"May 1, 2007," substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Cross References

Class 5 or class 11 liquor licensee; National Human
Trafficking Resource Center hotline; posting requirement; penalty, see §371-20.

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 788, 790.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next